Illinois, session 104th, SB3857.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 150/2)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. 8    (A) As used in this Article, "sex offender" means any 9person who is:10        (1) charged pursuant to Illinois law, or any 11    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 12    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law, with a sex 13    offense set forth in subsection (B) of this Section or the 14    attempt to commit an included sex offense, and:15            (a) is convicted of such offense or an attempt to 16        commit such offense; or17            (b) is found not guilty by reason of insanity of 18        such offense or an attempt to commit such offense; or19            (c) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 20        pursuant to Section 104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal 21        Procedure of 1963 of such offense or an attempt to 22        commit such offense; or23            (d) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an   SB3857- 2 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to Section 2        104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 3        for the alleged commission or attempted commission of 4        such offense; or5            (e) is found not guilty by reason of insanity 6        following a hearing conducted pursuant to a federal, 7        Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 8        foreign country law substantially similar to Section 9        104-25(c) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 of 10        such offense or of the attempted commission of such 11        offense; or12            (f) is the subject of a finding not resulting in an 13        acquittal at a hearing conducted pursuant to a 14        federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 15        state, or foreign country law substantially similar to 16        Section 104-25(a) of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 17        1963 for the alleged violation or attempted commission 18        of such offense; or19        (2) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 20    to the Illinois Sexually Dangerous Persons Act, or any 21    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 22    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or23        (3) subject to the provisions of Section 2 of the 24    Interstate Agreements on Sexually Dangerous Persons Act; 25    or26        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to   SB3857- 3 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 2    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 3    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law; or4        (5) adjudicated a juvenile delinquent as the result of 5    committing or attempting to commit an act which, if 6    committed by an adult, would constitute any of the 7    offenses specified in item (B), (C), or (C-5) of this 8    Section or a violation of any substantially similar 9    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 10    or foreign country law, or found guilty under Article V of 11    the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of committing or attempting 12    to commit an act which, if committed by an adult, would 13    constitute any of the offenses specified in item (B), (C), 14    or (C-5) of this Section or a violation of any 15    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 16    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law.17    Convictions that result from or are connected with the 18same act, or result from offenses committed at the same time, 19shall be counted for the purpose of this Article as one 20conviction. Any conviction set aside pursuant to law is not a 21conviction for purposes of this Article.22     For purposes of this Section, "convicted" shall have the 23same meaning as "adjudicated".24    (B) As used in this Article, "sex offense" means:25        (1) A violation of any of the following Sections of 26    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012:  SB3857- 4 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1            11-20.1 (child sexual abuse material or child 2        pornography),3            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 4        pornography), 5            11-6 (indecent solicitation of a child),6            11-9.1 (sexual exploitation of a child),7            11-9.2 (custodial sexual misconduct), 8            11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person with a 9        disability), 10            11-14.4 (promoting commercial sexual exploitation 11        of a child), 12            11-15.1 (soliciting for a sexually exploited 13        child),14            11-18.1 (patronizing a sexually exploited child),15            11-17.1 (keeping a place of commercial sexual 16        exploitation of a child),17            11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),18            11-19.2 (exploitation of a child), 19            11-25 (grooming), 20            11-26 (traveling to meet a minor or traveling to 21        meet a child), 22            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault), 23            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 24        assault),25            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 26        assault of a child),  SB3857- 5 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1            11-1.50 or 12-15 (criminal sexual abuse),2            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual 3        abuse),4            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child).5            An attempt to commit any of these offenses.6        (1.5) A violation of any of the following Sections of 7    the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 8    when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, the 9    defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense was 10    sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 11    Offender Evaluation and Treatment Act, and the offense was 12    committed on or after January 1, 1996:13            10-1 (kidnapping),14            10-2 (aggravated kidnapping),15            10-3 (unlawful restraint),16            10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint).17        If the offense was committed before January 1, 1996, 18    it is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 19    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 20    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 21    applies. 22        (1.6) First degree murder under Section 9-1 of the 23    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, 24    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 25    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.26        (1.7) (Blank).  SB3857- 6 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1        (1.7-1) A violation or attempted violation of any of 2    the following provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 or 3    the Criminal Code of 2012:4            (i) subsection (b) of Section 10-9 (involuntary 5        servitude), provided the offense was for commercial 6        sexual activity, a sexually explicit performance, or 7        other sexual services,8            (ii) subsection (c) of Section 10-9 (involuntary 9        sexual servitude of a minor),10            (iii) subsection (d) of Section 10-9 (trafficking 11        in persons), provided the offense was for commercial 12        sexual activity, a sexually explicit performance, or 13        other sexual services. 14        (1.8) A violation or attempted violation of Section 15    11-11 (sexual relations within families) of the Criminal 16    Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, and the offense 17    was committed on or after June 1, 1997. If the offense was 18    committed before June 1, 1997, it is a sex offense 19    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 20    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 21    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 22        (1.9) Child abduction under paragraph (10) of 23    subsection (b) of Section 10-5 of the Criminal Code of 24    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 committed by luring or 25    attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 into a motor 26    vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling place   SB3857- 7 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1    without the consent of the parent or lawful custodian of 2    the child for other than a lawful purpose and the offense 3    was committed on or after January 1, 1998, provided the 4    offense was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of 5    the Sex Offender Management Board Act. If the offense was 6    committed before January 1, 1998, it is a sex offense 7    requiring registration only when the person is convicted 8    of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 9    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 10        (1.10) A violation or attempted violation of any of 11    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 12    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 13    after July 1, 1999:14            10-4 (forcible detention, if the victim is under 15        18 years of age), provided the offense was sexually 16        motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender 17        Management Board Act,18            11-6.5 (indecent solicitation of an adult),19            11-14.3 that involves soliciting for a person 20        engaged in the sex trade, or 11-15 (soliciting for a 21        person engaged in the sex trade, if the victim is under 22        18 years of age),23            subdivision (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B) of Section 24        11-14.3, or Section 11-16 (pandering, if the victim is 25        under 18 years of age),26            11-18 (patronizing a person engaged in the sex   SB3857- 8 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1        trade, if the victim is under 18 years of age),2            subdivision (a)(2)(C) of Section 11-14.3, or 3        Section 11-19 (pimping, if the victim is under 18 4        years of age).5        If the offense was committed before July 1, 1999, it 6    is a sex offense requiring registration only when the 7    person is convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and 8    paragraph (2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act 9    applies. 10        (1.11) A violation or attempted violation of any of 11    the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 12    Criminal Code of 2012 when the offense was committed on or 13    after August 22, 2002:14            11-9 or 11-30 (public indecency for a third or 15        subsequent conviction).16        If the third or subsequent conviction was imposed 17    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring 18    registration only when the person is convicted of any 19    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 20    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 21        (1.12) A violation or attempted violation of Section 22    5.1 of the Wrongs to Children Act or Section 11-9.1A of the 23    Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 24    (permitting sexual abuse) when the offense was committed 25    on or after August 22, 2002. If the offense was committed 26    before August 22, 2002, it is a sex offense requiring   SB3857- 9 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1    registration only when the person is convicted of any 2    felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 3    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 4        (2) A violation of any former law of this State 5    substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 6    subsection (B) of this Section.7    (C) A conviction for an offense of federal law, Uniform 8Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state or a 9foreign country that is substantially equivalent to any 10offense listed in subsections (B), (C), (E), and (E-5) of this 11Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 12Article. A finding or adjudication as a sexually dangerous 13person or a sexually violent person under any federal law, 14Uniform Code of Military Justice, or the law of another state 15or foreign country that is substantially equivalent to the 16Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or the Sexually Violent Persons 17Commitment Act shall constitute an adjudication for the 18purposes of this Article.19    (C-5) A person at least 17 years of age at the time of the 20commission of the offense who is convicted of first degree 21murder under Section 9-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 22Criminal Code of 2012, against a person under 18 years of age, 23shall be required to register for natural life. A conviction 24for an offense of federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, 25sister state, or foreign country law that is substantially 26equivalent to any offense listed in subsection (C-5) of this   SB3857- 10 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1Section shall constitute a conviction for the purpose of this 2Article. This subsection (C-5) applies to a person who 3committed the offense before June 1, 1996 if: (i) the person is 4incarcerated in an Illinois Department of Corrections facility 5on August 20, 2004 (the effective date of Public Act 93-977), 6or (ii) subparagraph (i) does not apply and the person is 7convicted of any felony after July 1, 2011, and paragraph 8(2.1) of subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies.9    (C-6) A person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent 10of first degree murder as defined in Section 9-1 of the 11Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, against a 12person 18 years of age or over, shall be required to register 13for his or her natural life. A conviction for an offense of 14federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, or 15foreign country law that is substantially equivalent to any 16offense listed in subsection (C-6) of this Section shall 17constitute a conviction for the purpose of this Article. This 18subsection (C-6) does not apply to those individuals released 19from incarceration more than 10 years prior to January 1, 2012 20(the effective date of Public Act 97-154). 21    (D) As used in this Article, "law enforcement agency 22having jurisdiction" means the Chief of Police in each of the 23municipalities in which the sex offender expects to reside, 24work, or attend school (1) upon his or her discharge, parole or 25release or (2) during the service of his or her sentence of 26probation or conditional discharge, or the Sheriff of the   SB3857- 11 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1county, in the event no Police Chief exists or if the offender 2intends to reside, work, or attend school in an unincorporated 3area. "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" includes 4the location where out-of-state students attend school and 5where out-of-state employees are employed or are otherwise 6required to register.7    (D-1) As used in this Article, "supervising officer" means 8the assigned Illinois Department of Corrections parole agent 9or county probation officer. 10    (E) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" means any 11person who, after July 1, 1999, is:12        (1) Convicted for an offense of federal, Uniform Code 13    of Military Justice, sister state, or foreign country law 14    that is substantially equivalent to any offense listed in 15    subsection (E) or (E-5) of this Section shall constitute a 16    conviction for the purpose of this Article. Convicted of a 17    violation or attempted violation of any of the following 18    Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 19    of 2012:20            10-5.1 (luring of a minor),21            11-14.4 that involves keeping a place of 22        commercial sexual exploitation of a child, or 11-17.1 23        (keeping a place of commercial sexual exploitation of 24        a child),25            subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) of Section 11-14.4, 26        or Section 11-19.1 (juvenile pimping),  SB3857- 12 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1            subdivision (a)(4) of Section 11-14.4, or Section 2        11-19.2 (exploitation of a child),3            11-20.1 (child sexual abuse material or child 4        pornography),5            11-20.1B or 11-20.3 (aggravated child 6        pornography),7            11-1.20 or 12-13 (criminal sexual assault),8            11-1.30 or 12-14 (aggravated criminal sexual 9        assault),10            11-1.40 or 12-14.1 (predatory criminal sexual 11        assault of a child),12            11-1.60 or 12-16 (aggravated criminal sexual 13        abuse),14            12-33 (ritualized abuse of a child);15        (2) (blank);16        (3) declared as a sexually dangerous person pursuant 17    to the Sexually Dangerous Persons Act or any substantially 18    similar federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister 19    state, or foreign country law;20        (4) found to be a sexually violent person pursuant to 21    the Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or any 22    substantially similar federal, Uniform Code of Military 23    Justice, sister state, or foreign country law;24        (5) convicted of a second or subsequent offense which 25    requires registration pursuant to this Act. For purposes 26    of this paragraph (5), "convicted" shall include a   SB3857- 13 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1    conviction under any substantially similar Illinois, 2    federal, Uniform Code of Military Justice, sister state, 3    or foreign country law;4        (6) (blank); or5        (7) if the person was convicted of an offense set 6    forth in this subsection (E) on or before July 1, 1999, the 7    person is a sexual predator for whom registration is 8    required only when the person is convicted of a felony 9    offense after July 1, 2011, and paragraph (2.1) of 10    subsection (c) of Section 3 of this Act applies. 11    (E-5) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 12means a person convicted of a violation or attempted violation 13of any of the following Sections of the Criminal Code of 1961 14or the Criminal Code of 2012: 15        (1) Section 9-1 (first degree murder, when the victim 16    was a person under 18 years of age and the defendant was at 17    least 17 years of age at the time of the commission of the 18    offense, provided the offense was sexually motivated as 19    defined in Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board 20    Act);21        (2) Section 11-9.5 (sexual misconduct with a person 22    with a disability);23        (3) when the victim is a person under 18 years of age, 24    the defendant is not a parent of the victim, the offense 25    was sexually motivated as defined in Section 10 of the Sex 26    Offender Management Board Act, and the offense was   SB3857- 14 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1    committed on or after January 1, 1996: (A) Section 10-1 2    (kidnapping), (B) Section 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping), 3    (C) Section 10-3 (unlawful restraint), and (D) Section 4    10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint); and5        (4) Section 10-5(b)(10) (child abduction committed by 6    luring or attempting to lure a child under the age of 16 7    into a motor vehicle, building, house trailer, or dwelling 8    place without the consent of the parent or lawful 9    custodian of the child for other than a lawful purpose and 10    the offense was committed on or after January 1, 1998, 11    provided the offense was sexually motivated as defined in 12    Section 10 of the Sex Offender Management Board Act).13    (E-10) As used in this Article, "sexual predator" also 14means a person required to register in another State due to a 15conviction, adjudication or other action of any court 16triggering an obligation to register as a sex offender, sexual 17predator, or substantially similar status under the laws of 18that State. 19    (F) As used in this Article, "out-of-state student" means 20any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 21predator who is enrolled in Illinois, on a full-time or 22part-time basis, in any public or private educational 23institution, including, but not limited to, any secondary 24school, trade or professional institution, or institution of 25higher learning.26    (G) As used in this Article, "out-of-state employee" means   SB3857- 15 -LRB104 18875 RLC 32320 b1any sex offender, as defined in this Section, or sexual 2predator who works in Illinois, regardless of whether the 3individual receives payment for services performed, for a 4period of time of 10 or more days or for an aggregate period of 5time of 30 or more days during any calendar year. Persons who 6operate motor vehicles in the State accrue one day of 7employment time for any portion of a day spent in Illinois.8    (H) As used in this Article, "school" means any public or 9private educational institution, including, but not limited 10to, any elementary or secondary school, trade or professional 11institution, or institution of higher education.12    (I) As used in this Article, "fixed residence" means any 13and all places that a sex offender resides for an aggregate 14period of time of 5 or more days in a calendar year. 15    (J) As used in this Article, "Internet protocol address" 16means the string of numbers by which a location on the Internet 17is identified by routers or other computers connected to the 18Internet.19(Source: P.A. 103-1071, eff. 7-1-25; 104-245, eff. 1-1-26; 20revised 11-21-25.)